Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4809.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
TITLE
An act to provide for the registration, titling, sale,
transfer, and regulation of certain vehicles operated upon the
public highways of this state or any other place open to the
general public or generally accessible to motor vehicles and
distressed vehicles; to provide for the licensing of dealers; to
provide for the examination, licensing, and control of operators
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


and chauffeurs; to provide for the giving of proof of financial
responsibility and security by owners and operators of vehicles; to
provide for the imposition, levy, and collection of specific taxes
on vehicles, and the levy and collection of sales and use taxes,
license fees, and permit fees; to provide for the regulation and
use of streets and highways; to create certain funds; to provide
penalties and sanctions for a violation of this act; to provide for
civil liability of manufacturers, the manufacturers of certain
devices, the manufacturers of automated technology, upfitters,
owners, and operators of vehicles and service of process on
residents and nonresidents; to regulate the introduction and use of
certain evidence; to regulate and certify the manufacturers of
certain devices; to provide for approval and certification of
installers and servicers of certain devices; to provide for the
levy of certain assessments; to authorize the secretary of state to
aid in the enforcement of unpaid tolls and enter agreements with
certain operators of international toll bridges and tunnels; to
provide for the powers and duties of certain operators of
international toll bridges and tunnels; to provide procedures for
disputing claims of unpaid tolls; to authorize the secretary of
state to enter into a reciprocity agreement with the duly
authorized representative of another state or tolling entity for
the enforcement and collection of tolls and related fees; to
provide for the enforcement of this act; to provide for the
creation of and to prescribe the powers and duties of certain state
and local agencies; to impose liability upon the state or local
agencies; to provide appropriations for certain purposes; to repeal
all other acts or parts of acts inconsistent with this act or
contrary to this act; and to repeal certain parts of this act on a
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


specific date.
Sec. 219. (1) The secretary of state shall refuse issuance of
a registration or a transfer of registration upon any of the
following grounds:
(a) The application contains a false or fraudulent statement,
the applicant has failed to furnish required information or
reasonable additional information requested by the secretary of
state, or the applicant is not entitled to the registration of the
vehicle under this act.
(b) The secretary of state has reasonable ground to believe
that the vehicle is a stolen or embezzled vehicle, or that the
granting of registration would constitute a fraud against the
rightful owner or other person having a valid lien upon the
vehicle.
(c) The registration of the vehicle is suspended or revoked
for any reason provided in the motor vehicle laws of this state.
(d) At the time of the application, the operator's or
chauffeur's license of the owner or co-owner or lessee or co-lessee
is suspended, revoked, or denied, except for an applicant who has
been issued a license under section 304, or the operator has never
been licensed by this state for a third or subsequent violation of
section 625 or 625m, a local ordinance substantially corresponding
to section 625 or 625m, or a law of another state substantially
corresponding to section 625 or 625m, or for a fourth or subsequent
suspension or revocation under section 904.
(e) The required fee has not been paid.
(f) The applicant, at the time of applying for registration or
a transfer of registration other than a temporary registration
issued under section 226b, fails to present a certificate of
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


compliance or waiver for a motor vehicle as required under either
part 63 or part 65 of the natural resources and environmental
protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.6301 to 324.6321 and 324.6501
to 324.6539.
(g) The application for registration of a vehicle with an
elected gross weight of 55,000 pounds or more is not accompanied
with proof of payment of the federal highway use tax levied under
the surface transportation assistance act of 1982, Public Law 97-
424.
(h) The applicant is a motor carrier subject to an out-of-
service order, the applicant has applied for a registration or
transfer registration as a subterfuge for a person subject to an
out-of-service order, or the applicant's business is operated,
managed, controlled by, or affiliated with a person that is
ineligible for registration, including, but not limited to, the
applicant, a relative or family member of the applicant, or a
corporate officer or shareholder of the applicant. As used in this
subdivision, "out-of-service order" means that term as defined in
49 CFR 390.5, and also includes an out-of-service order issued
under 49 CFR 386.73.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the
secretary of state has received a notice from an operator of an
international toll bridge or tunnel as described in section 820a(6)
identifying the applicant. The secretary of state shall not refuse
issuance of a registration or a transfer of registration under this
subdivision if either of the following conditions is met:
(i) The secretary of state receives a timely request for review
under section 820a(5) with any required affidavits and the review
is pending as described in section 820a(5)(b)(ii).
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


(ii) The secretary of state receives a notice described in
section 820a(10) or otherwise determined that the applicant has
fewer than 6 unpaid tolls and related fees due to the operator.
(2) The secretary of state shall refuse issuance of a
certificate of title or a salvage certificate of title upon any of
the following grounds:
(a) The application contains a false or fraudulent statement,
the applicant has failed to furnish required information or
reasonable additional information requested by the secretary of
state, or the applicant is not entitled to the issuance of a
certificate of title or salvage certificate of title under this
act.
(b) The secretary of state has reasonable ground to believe
that the vehicle is a stolen or embezzled vehicle or that the
issuance of a certificate of title or a salvage certificate of
title would constitute a fraud against the rightful owner or other
person having a valid security interest upon the vehicle.
(c) The required fee has not been paid.
(3) The secretary of state shall not issue a registration for
a vehicle for which a temporary registration plate was issued under
section 904c until the violation resulting in the issuance of the
plate is adjudicated or the vehicle is transferred to a person who
is subject to payment of a use tax under section 3 of the use tax
act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.93.
Sec. 820a. (1) Upon appropriation of funds and authorization
of full-time employees for the program, the secretary of state
shall implement a tolling enforcement program as provided in this
section and section 820b. Under the tolling enforcement program, at
the request of an operator, the secretary of state shall negotiate
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


with the operator and enter into a tolling enforcement agreement
consistent with this section to aid in the enforcement of
collecting unpaid tolls. This section applies only to tolls
enforced pursuant to a tolling enforcement agreement and does not
prevent any other method for collecting an unpaid toll. The tolling
enforcement agreement must provide for all of the following:
(a) A method for determining the registered owner or lessee of
a vehicle for which an individual failed to pay a toll.
(b) The form of a notice of unpaid toll to be sent to an
individual who failed to pay the toll.
(c) The service fee that the secretary of state may charge the
operator for providing services under the tolling enforcement
agreement.
(d) A dispute resolution process for an individual to dispute
a notice of unpaid toll.
(e) Data sharing standards for the transmittal, retention,
breach, and use of data, including that the operator shall use any
data shared by the secretary of state solely for the purpose of
collecting tolls.
(f) That the data exchanged must include both of the
following:
(i) The names and addresses of individuals who allegedly failed
to pay a toll.
(ii) Toll transaction details of the vehicles and registration
plates.
(g) A statement that the tolls and related fees collected by
or on behalf of the operator are the property of the operator and
that an operator may do any of the following:
(i) Establish, collect, and enforce the payment of tolls.
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


(ii) Exempt any vehicle or class of vehicles from the payment
of tolls.
(iii) Determine the methods of payment of tolls.
(iv) Establish terms and conditions for the registration and
distribution of toll devices.
(h) Standards for who is responsible for paying a toll if the
motor vehicle is leased or rented.
(2) If a motor vehicle travels on an international toll bridge
or tunnel located in this state and a toll for traveling on the
international bridge or tunnel is not paid prior to travel or at
the time of travel, the operator must send a bill to the registered
owner or lessee of the motor vehicle for the amount of the unpaid
toll by first class mail or, with the consent of the registered
owner or lessee of a motor vehicle, to an email designated by the
registered owner or lessee. All of the following apply to the bill
sent under this subsection:
(a) The operator must send the bill not more than 90 days
after receiving accurate data from the secretary of state. If a
bill is not sent in the required time, the operator waives
collection of the toll under this section.
(b) The primary method of determining the registered owner or
lessee of a vehicle must be by using the vehicle's registration
plate.
(c) Unless the registered owner or lessee consents to a
different form of bill, a bill sent under this subsection must
include all of the following information:
(i) The name and address of the registered owner or lessee of
the motor vehicle that traveled on the international bridge or
tunnel.
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


(ii) The date and approximate time that the travel occurred.
(iii) The motor vehicle's registration plate number and an image
of the registration plate, if the operator captured an electronic
image of the motor vehicle's registration plate when it traveled on
the international bridge or tunnel.
(iv) The amount of the toll due and an explanation of how
payment may be made.
(v) The date by which the toll must be paid to avoid the
imposition of a related fee and the amount of the related fee.
(vi) A statement that the registered owner or lessee of a motor
vehicle that is associated with 6 or more unpaid tolls shall not
renew the vehicle's registration until the tolls are paid.
(vii) A clear and concise explanation of how to contest
liability for the toll.
(d) The operator waives collection of the toll under this
section if the bill is not supported by 1 or both of the following:
(i) An image of the motor vehicle's registration plate.
(ii) An identification of the registered owner or lessee of the
vehicle made using a registered tolling device.
(3) A registered owner or lessee of a motor vehicle who
receives a bill for an unpaid toll must take one of the following
actions not more than 30 days after receiving the bill:
(a) Pay the bill.
(b) Dispute the unpaid toll with the toll operator.
(4) If the registered owner or lessee does not take 1 of the
actions required under subsection (3) within the required time, the
operator may add reasonable related fees to the amount the
registered owner or lessee owes. The sum of any related fees must
be reasonable and not exceed 3 times the toll amount per unpaid
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


toll.
(5) A registered owner or lessee who receives a bill for an
unpaid toll and who disputes liability for the toll under
subsection (3)(b) may appeal an adverse determination by the
operator by sending a request for review of the toll to the
secretary of state subject to all of the following:
(a) The request for review must be sent not more than 30 days
after the date of the determination by the toll operator or the
right to a review is waived.
(b) If the request for review is sent timely with any required
affidavit, both of the following apply until after the conclusion
of the review:
(i) The operator must not collect the disputed toll and any
related fee added to the bill for that toll.
(ii) The secretary of state must not refuse to issue a
registration to or transfer a registration issued to the registered
owner or lessee under section 219(1)(i).
(c) If the secretary of state determines that the registered
owner or lessee who requested the review is responsible for the
toll, the secretary of state must send the registered owner or
lessee and the operator a notice of that determination. The notice
must include the number of unpaid tolls the registered owner or
lessee has outstanding and a statement that a vehicle owner or
lessee who has 6 or more unpaid tolls will not be able to renew the
vehicle's registration until at least 1 of the unpaid tolls, and
its related fees, are paid.
(d) If the secretary of state determines that the registered
owner or lessee who requested the review is not responsible for the
unpaid toll, the operator must absolve the registered owner or
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


lessee from any liability for that unpaid toll and related fees and
must not attempt any other methods of enforcement and collection
otherwise available under the law.
(6) If a motor vehicle that travels on an international toll
bridge or tunnel located in this state is associated with 6 or more
tolls that remain unpaid for more than 90 days after the registered
owner or lessee receives a notice of unpaid toll as required by a
tolling enforcement agreement under this section, an operator may
notify the secretary of state of the failure to pay the tolls on a
form determined by the secretary of state. The secretary of state
must review the notice and make an initial determination of the
registered owner or lessee's responsibility.
(7) If the secretary of state receives a notice under
subsection (6) and after the secretary of state has made an initial
determination of the registered owner or lessee's responsibility,
the secretary of state must notify the registered owner or lessee
that the vehicle is associated with 6 or more unpaid tolls and is
subject to a registration hold under section 219. The notice must
include an explanation of how to dispute the registration hold.
(8) A registered owner or lessee who receives a notice of the
registration hold under subsection (7) may send a request to the
secretary of state to review the unpaid tolls. The registered owner
or lessee must send the request for review and any required
affidavit to the secretary of state not more than 30 days after the
date of the notice of the registration hold. A registered owner or
lessee who does not send a request for review and any required
affidavit to the secretary of state within the required time waives
the right to a review. Both of the following apply to a review of a
registration hold under this subsection:
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


(a) If the secretary of state determines that the registered
owner or lessee is responsible for the tolls, the secretary of
state must send the registered owner or lessee a notice informing
the registered owner or lessee and the operator of the secretary of
state's determination.
(b) If the secretary of state determines that the registered
owner or lessee who requested the review is not responsible for 1
or more of the unpaid tolls, the operator must absolve the
registered owner or lessee person from any responsibility for those
unpaid tolls and related fees that the secretary of state
determined were not due, and must not attempt any other methods of
enforcement and collection otherwise available under the law.
(9) Under section 219, the secretary of state must refuse to
issue a registration to or transfer a registration issued to a
registered owner or lessee who meets either of the following
criteria:
(a) Failed to timely request a review and provide any required
affidavit under subsection (8).
(b) Is determined to be responsible for the unpaid tolls under
subsection (8)(a).
(10) If an operator gives notice to the secretary of state
identifying an individual as described in subsection (6), the
operator shall immediately notify the secretary of state on a form
prescribed by the secretary of state if the operator later
determines that the individual has fewer than 6 unpaid tolls and
related fees due to the operator.
(11) The registered owner or lessee of the vehicle is presumed
to be the individual responsible for paying a toll under this
section. An individual disputing liability may establish that the
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


vehicle was operated by another individual when the vehicle
incurred a toll by submitting an affidavit attesting to one of the
following:
(a) The name and address of the individual operating the
vehicle at the time the toll was incurred.
(b) That the vehicle was stolen. An affidavit submitted under
this subparagraph must be supported by evidence of the theft,
including, but not limited to, an insurance or police report
concerning the theft.
(c) That the vehicle was sold or transferred to another
individual. An affidavit submitted under this subdivision must be
supported by evidence of the transfer, including, but not limited
to, insurance information, a bill of sale, or a copy of the title.
(12) If an individual establishes that a vehicle was operated
by another individual under subsection (11), that other individual
is liable for the payment of the toll.
(13) This section does not authorize an operator to charge and
collect tolls on a bridge or tunnel if not otherwise authorized by
law.
(14) The secretary of state may promulgate rules necessary to
implement this section under the administrative procedures act of
1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328.
(15) As used in this section and in section 820b:
(a) "Operator" means the owner or operator of a publicly or
privately owned international toll bridge or tunnel part of which
is located in this state that uses an automatic tolling system that
identifies an individual responsible for paying a toll by doing
either of the following:
(i) Photographing the individual's vehicle registration plate.
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


(ii) Detecting a toll device.
(b) "Related fee" means any fee or charge, including interest,
permitted by law for creating, maintaining, administering, billing,
and collecting an account.
(c) "Toll" means a toll for operating a vehicle on part of an
international toll bridge or tunnel located in this state and any
related fees.
(d) "Toll device" means an electronic device used to identify
a vehicle, including, but not limited to, a transponder system,
that is linked to an account for which an individual must register.
Sec. 820b. (1) The secretary of state may, on the written
request of an operator, enter into a reciprocity agreement with the
duly authorized representative of another state or tolling entity
for the enforcement and collection of tolls.
(2) A reciprocity agreement must provide that if the issuance
of registration or a transfer of registration of a motor vehicle
would be refused under section 219, or pursuant to a comparable law
or regulation of another state, because the registrant of the motor
vehicle failed to pay applicable tolls, then the state issuing the
registration shall likewise refuse the issuance of registration or
transfer of registration until the registrant has paid the tolls
and otherwise complied with the rules and regulations of the other
state or tolling entity that imposed the tolls.
(3) Before entering into a reciprocity agreement, the
secretary of state must confirm and include in the reciprocity
agreement all of the following:
(a) The other state or tolling entity has its own effective
reciprocal procedure for collecting tolls and agrees to collect
tolls by employing sanctions for nonpayment that include denial of
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


the issuance of registration or transfer of registration of a motor
vehicle.
(b) The other state or tolling entity provides adequate
notice, due process, and appeal protections to avoid the likelihood
of a false, a mistaken, or an unjustified claim of nonpayment.
(c) The registered owner of a motor vehicle registered in this
state may present evidence to the other state or tolling entity by
mail, telephone, electronic means, or other means to invoke rights
of due process without having to appear personally in the other
state where the nonpayment is alleged to have occurred.
(d) The secretary of state may charge the other state or
tolling entity a fee sufficient to cover the costs of collection
services.
(e) Additional terms and procedures as are necessary and
proper to facilitate the administration of the reciprocity
agreement.
(4) This section does not limit the enforcement or collection
of a toll by any means available under the law.
(5) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the secretary of
state may release registration information and may take other
actions that are reasonably necessary to effectuate the enforcement
or collection of tolls under a reciprocity agreement.
(6) The secretary of state may promulgate rules necessary to
implement this section under the administrative procedures act of
1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) "Reciprocity agreement" means a reciprocity agreement
entered under subsection (1).
(b) "State" means any state, territory, or possession of the
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im


United States, the District of Columbia, or any province of Canada.
(c) "Tolling entity" means an entity authorized to impose and
collect tolls under the laws of this state or another state.
Final Page
JJR H00501'25 (H-4) jn98im